Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-235
Option students; treatment; building assignment.

For purposes of all duties, entitlements, and rights established by law, including special education as provided in section 79-1127, except as provided in section 79-241 and, for open enrollment option students, except as provided in section 79-235.01, option students shall be treated as resident students of the option school district. The option student may request a particular school building, but the building assignment of the option student shall be determined by the option school district except as provided in section 79-235.01 for open enrollment option students and in subsection (3) of section 79-2110 for students attending a focus school, focus program, or magnet school. In determining eligibility for extracurricular activities as defined in section 79-2,126, the option student shall be treated similarly to other students who transfer into the school from another public, private, denominational, or parochial school.

Laws 1989, LB 183, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 843, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3404;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 39;

Laws 1996, LB 1050, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 249, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 14.
July 21, 2016